src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-muqr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - muʼr: # Noun 84 'eng /est mure/fin' - full paradigm
     muʼr+N+Sg+Nom: [muʼr, mur]
     muʼr+N+Sg+Gen: [muʼr, mur]
     muʼr+N+Sg+Par: [muʼrtõ, murtõ]
     muʼr+N+Sg+Dat: [muʼrrõn, murrõn]
     muʼr+N+Sg+Ins: [muʼrkõks, murkõks]
     muʼr+N+Sg+Ill: [muʼrrõ, murrõ]
     muʼr+N+Sg+Ela: [muʼrstõ, murstõ]
     muʼr+N+Pl+Nom: murūd
     muʼr+N+Pl+Gen: murūd
     muʼr+N+Pl+Par: murīdi
     muʼr+N+Pl+Dat: murūdõn
     muʼr+N+Pl+Ins: murūdõks
     muʼr+N+Pl+Ill: murīž
     muʼr+N+Pl+Ela: [muʼršti, muršti]
